Hawaii, session 2026, HB2202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $293,050,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the forty-second representative district, as follows: 1.   Kapolei high school, Oahu A.  Construction of a new performing arts auditorium to promote arts education and meet the needs of west side schools, which currently have no auditoriums. Design                                 $4,000,000 Construction                           $61,000,000 Total funding                     $65,000,000 B.  Construction of a new integrated academy building featuring fourteen classrooms to address future student enrollment growth and expansion of innovative programs. Design                                 $3,000,000 Construction                           $47,000,000 Total funding                     $50,000,000 C.  Re-crowing and sodding of athletic stadium grass field to address safety issues. Design                                 $50,000 Construction                           $1,450,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 D.  Installation of field turf for softball and baseball athletic fields. Design                                 $500,000 Construction                           $8,500,000 Total funding                     $9,000,000 E.  Installation of rubber track to address the safety issues with current dirt track. Design                                 $50,000 Construction                           $2,950,000 Total funding                     $3,000,000 F.  Partition to increase capacity according to phase 2 of school development. Total funding                     $13,000,000 G.  Improvements for the school softball field. Total funding                     $350,000 2. Ewa elementary school, Oahu Implementation of ADA public accommodations. Total funding                     $900,000 3.  Campbell high school, Oahu Ensuring ADA program access. Total funding                     $1,300,000 4.  East Kapolei elementary school, Oahu Construction of a new school. Total funding                     $146,000,000 5.  Honouliuli middle school, Oahu Installation of signage and pedestrian improvements. Total funding                     $3,000,000 SECTION 2.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $6,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the forty-second representative district, as follows: 1. Kanehili Hawaiian Homestead, Oahu Construction of Kanehili Community Association Park. Total funding                     $1,500,000 2. Kaupeʻa Hawaiian Homestead, Oahu A.  Construction of Kaupeʻa Hawaiian Homestead Community Park. Total funding                     $2,000,000 B.  Completion of a retaining wall along Kamaaha Street. Total funding                     $1,500,000 3. Kaʻuluokahaʻi Hawaiian Homestead, Oahu Construction of a retaining wall along Keahumoa Parkway. Total funding                     $1,500,000 SECTION 3.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the forty-second representative district, as follows: 1. Kapolei Parkway, Oahu Construction of crosswalks, speed humps/speed tables, and road signs on Kapolei Parkway due to its proximity to Kapolei high school and Kapolei middle school. Total funding:                    $2,000,000 SECTION 4.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $10,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the forty-second representative district, as follows: 1.  Villages of Kapolei Association, Oahu Construction, equipment and appurtenances for maintenance and upkeep of roads, vegetation, and road upgrades. Total funding                     $10,000,000 SECTION 5.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2029, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 6.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 2 shall be expended by the department of Hawaiian home lands for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 8.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 3 shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 9.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 4 shall be expended by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 10.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________